District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.13

Bylaws.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 271, Pub. L. 87-569, § 13
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-301.13.
1981 Ed., § 29-513.
1973 Ed., § 29-1013.

Prior Codifications